Washington statutes.
RCW 15.53.9046

Cooperation with other entities.

The director may cooperate with and enter into agreements with governmental agencies of this state, other states, agencies of the federal government and private associations in order to carry out the purpose and provisions of this chapter.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 31 s 24.]